Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-302 Initial qualifications for
mutual insurers. (a) The commissioner shall not issue a certificate of
authority to a domestic mutual insurer unless:

(1) It has fully qualified under this code; and

(2) It has met the minimum requirements for the
classes of insurance it proposes to transact as provided in this code.

(b) All applications for insurance submitted
by such an insurer as fulfilling qualification requirements shall be bona fide
applications from persons resident in this State covering life, property, or
risks resident or located in this State.

(c) All qualifying premiums collected and
initial surplus funds of such an insurer shall be in cash. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next